Missouri, session 2026, HB2988.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 41.942 and 105.270, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 41.942 and 105.270, to read as follows:
41.942. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of section 105.270, any
officer or employee of this state, or of any department or agency of this state, or of any
county, municipality, school district or other political subdivision, and any other public
employee of this state, who is or may become a member of the National Guard or of any
reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States and who is engaged in the
performance of duty in the service of the United States under competent orders for an
extended and indefinite period of time, shall be entitled to leave of absence from his or her
respective duties as a public officer or employee until such military service is completed
without loss of position, seniority, accumulated leave, impairment of performance appraisal,
pay status, work schedule including shift, working days and days off assigned to the officer or
employee at the time leave commences, and any other right or benefit to which the officer or
employee is entitled, and no retirement benefit shall be diminished or eliminated because of
such service.
2. The officer or employee shall file with the appointing authority or supervising
agency an official order from the appropriate military authority as evidence of such duty for
which the leave of absence is granted.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2988 2
3. A volunteer firefighter, as defined in section 320.333, shall be entitled to all
protections of this section applicable to public employees other than protections relating
to monetary compensation, as defined in section 320.333.
105.270. 1. All officers and employees of this state, or of any department or agency
thereof, or of any county, municipality, school district, or other political subdivision, and all
other public employees of this state who are or may become members of the National Guard
or of any reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States, shall be entitled to
leave of absence from their respective duties, without loss of time, pay, regular leave,
impairment of efficiency rating, or of any other rights or benefits, to which otherwise entitled,
for all periods of military services during which they are engaged in the performance of duty
or training in the service of this state at the call of the governor and as ordered by the adjutant
general without regard to length of time, and for all periods of military services during which
they are engaged in the performance of duty in the service of the United States under
competent orders for a period not to exceed a total of [one hundred twenty hours] thirty-eight
working days in any federal fiscal year.
2. Before any payment of salary is made covering the period of the leave the officer
or the employee shall file with the appointing authority or supervising agency an official
order from the appropriate military authority as evidence of such duty for which military
leave pay is granted which order shall contain the certification of the officer or employee's
commanding officer of performance of duty in accordance with the terms of such order.
3. No member of the organized militia shall be discharged from employment by any
of the aforementioned agencies because of being a member of the organized militia, nor shall
he or she be hindered or prevented from performing any militia service he or she may be
called upon to perform by proper authority nor otherwise be discriminated against or
dissuaded from enlisting or continuing his or her service in the militia by threat or injury to
him or her in respect to his or her employment. Any officer or agent of the aforementioned
agencies violating any of the provisions of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other administrative rule or law to the
contrary, any person entitled to military leave pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section shall only be charged military leave for any hours which that person would
otherwise have been required to work had it not been for such military leave. The minimum
charge for military leave shall be one hour and additional charges for military leave shall be in
multiples of the minimum charge.
✔